Washington statutes.
RCW 33.20.040

Minors as members.

Subject to *chapter 30.22 RCW, minors may become depositors or members of an association and all contracts entered into between a minor and an association, with respect to his or her membership or his or her deposits therein, shall be valid and enforceable, and a minor may not disaffirm, because of his or her minority, any such membership or agreement in connection therewith.

[ 2011 c 336 s 761; 1982 c 3 s 38; 1981 c 192 s 30; 1945 c 235 s 41; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 3717-160. Prior: 1933 c 183 ss 24, 40; 1919 c 169 s 5; 1913 c 110 s 6.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Chapter 30.22 RCW was recodified as chapter 30A.22 RCW pursuant to 2014 c 37 s 4, effective January 5, 2015.

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.

Effective date—1981 c 192: See RCW 30A.22.900.